California statutes. Education Code
 parent does not have safe or adequate housing, the fair market rent, as described in Section 888.113 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, for an apartment in the metropolitan area or nonmetropolitan county where the campus is located, disaggregated by student parent family size.

(D) Transportation costs, disaggregated by student parent family size, that considers available information such as institutional survey
 responses and the Student Aid Commission’s Student Expenses and Resources Survey.

(2) Model instructions for purposes of all of the following:

(A) Identifying a student parent for purposes of adjusting the student parent’s cost of attendance to include food, housing, transportation, and childcare expenses. The model instructions shall include, but are not limited to, confirmation by a financial aid officer based on information found in the student parent’s Free Application for Federal Student Aid or California Dream Act application.

(B) Updating and posting cost of attendance and dependent care allowance
 information, using student-friendly language, on campus internet websites. The posted information shall include, but is not limited to, financial aid internet websites, and the student parent internet web page, as set forth in Section 66027.81.

(C) Sharing cost of attendance information in admitted student materials.

(D) Explaining the dependent care allowance to student parents.

(E) Informing student parents of affordable childcare options offered by the campus or within the local community.

(c) On or before the start of the 2026–27 academic year, each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State
 University shall, and each campus of the University of
 California is requested to, implement the policy developed and disseminated pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) (1) (A) On or before the start of the 2026–27 academic year, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall establish a data element in the systemwide data management information system to identify student parents.

(B) On or before the
 start of the 2026–27 academic year, each campus of the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, establish a data field in the campus’s data management information system to identify student parents.

(2) On or before the start of the 2026–27 academic year, each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, do all of the following:

(A) Enter student parent data in the data field
 or the data element
 established pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) Report student parent data obtained pursuant to this subdivision to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the President of the University of California, respectively, for
 their request of the governing board established pursuant to Section 10864 to include that student parent data in the California Cradle-to-Career Data System established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 10850) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(C) Use the data field or the data element established pursuant to paragraph (1) for additional purposes, which may include, but are not limited to, granting priority course registration and
 providing information about available public benefits to student parents.

(e) On or before the start of the 2026–27 academic year, each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, update the campus net price calculator to include a baseline student parent cost estimate, disaggregated by age and number of dependent children, using the methodologies and information described in this section and any available federal guidance on best practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 962, Sec. 3.   (AB 2458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66027.83.

The financial aid office on each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and the financial aid office on each campus of the University of California is requested to, provide all of the following to students with dependent children:

(a) Information on the campus’ childcare development center and childcare offerings, if applicable.

(b) Referral to the campus Basic Needs Center established pursuant to Section 66023.4 or 66023.5 for support accessing information, including, but not limited to, information and connections to local resource and referral agencies
 in order to obtain support in applying for state and federal childcare subsidies and programs and finding local childcare providers.

(c) Information on any supplemental awards such as the awards for students with dependent children established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 600, Sec. 3.   (SB 271)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Working Families Student Fee Transparency and Accountability Act [66028. - 66028.6.]

66028.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Working Families Student Fee Transparency and Accountability Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   (AB 970)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

66028.1.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Consultation” or “consult” means a meeting between representatives from the University of California or the California State University and their respective statewide student association representatives in which the representatives
 from the institutions provide, at minimum, all the following information at least five days before the meeting:

(1) A justification for a fee increase proposal, setting forth the facts supporting the fee increase.

(2) A statement specifying the purposes for which revenue derived from a fee increase will be used.

(3) A description of the efforts to mitigate the impact of the fee increase on needy students.

(4) The potential impact to students, including, but not limited to, the changes to the minimum workload burden for all students, if applicable, institutional financial aid awards, and the average student loan debt for undergraduates.

(5) Alternative proposals that can be considered in lieu of the proposed net student fee revenue proposal.

(b) “Cost of attendance” means the mandatory systemwide fees, books and supplies, room and board, transportation, and miscellaneous personal expenses for an undergraduate California resident student, as used in determining financial aid eligibility.

(c) “Mandatory systemwide fees” means the fees that resident students enrolled in the California State University or the University of California, as applicable, are required to pay in order to
 enroll in courses for the academic term pursuant to any law or any policy adopted by the trustees or the regents, as applicable.

(d) “Regents” means the Regents of the University of California.

(e) “Resident” means a student who is exempt from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 68000) of Part 41.

(f) “Trustees” means the Trustees of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   (AB 970)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

66028.2.

The following requirements apply to student financial aid for resident students, and mandatory systemwide fees charged at the University of California and the California State University:

(a) As any changes in mandatory systemwide fees and financial aid resources are considered, the impact on students shall be explained to students, including, but not limited to, changes to the minimum work or loan burden for all students, if applicable, institutional financial aid awards, and the average student loan debt for undergraduate students.

(b) Students shall be consulted before increases on mandatory systemwide fees are proposed, so that students can provide input and ask questions
 regarding the need for any increases in mandatory systemwide fees.

(c) Adequate advance notice shall be provided to students regarding any future mandatory systemwide fees, thereby allowing the students and their families greater time to prepare for the mandatory systemwide fees to be assessed.

(d) In order to ensure that access is not precluded for any eligible student, and particularly for financially needy students, all current and prospective students shall be provided with timely information concerning student financial aid, including the processes associated with applying for and obtaining student financial assistance.

(e) In order for the general public to maintain confidence in the state’s public colleges and universities, the state’s public colleges and universities shall ensure transparency in the uses of
 mandatory systemwide fee revenue and the rationale for implementing mandatory systemwide fee increases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 642, Sec. 1.   (AB 1307)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

66028.3.

(a) Ten days prior to holding a meeting to discuss or adopt an increase in mandatory systemwide fees, the University of California and the California State University shall provide public notice of the proposed mandatory systemwide fee increase as a discussion item in the public agenda for a meeting of the respective governing board. The public notice shall allow for comments to be received, both verbally and in writing, at the meeting and during the 45-day period required pursuant to subdivision (c). The public notice of the proposed mandatory systemwide fee increase shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) A justification for the fee increase
 proposal, setting forth the facts supporting the fee increase.(2) A statement specifying the purposes for which revenue derived from a fee increase will be used.

(3) A description of the efforts to mitigate the impact of the fee increase on needy students.

(4) The potential impact to students, including, but not limited to, the changes to the minimum workload burden for all students, if applicable, institutional financial aid awards, and the average student loan debt for undergraduates.

(5) Alternative proposals that can be considered in lieu of the proposed net student fee revenue proposal.

(b) The University of California and the California State University shall consult with their respective statewide student associations at least 30 days prior to
 providing public notice of the proposed mandatory systemwide fee increase. The range of potential mandatory systemwide fees under consideration for the next fiscal year shall be discussed with appropriate student representatives at the time of consultation before public notice of the mandatory systemwide fee increase proposal.

(c) The regents and the trustees shall not act to adopt a mandatory systemwide fee increase until at least 45 days after a public meeting is held to discuss the fee. The regents and the trustees shall provide a summary of the comments received pursuant to subdivision (a) in the public notice provided before the meeting to adopt a mandatory systemwide fee increase.

(d) The regents and the trustees shall not adopt an increase in mandatory systemwide fees after the 90th day prior to the commencement of classes for the academic
 year. This prohibition shall not apply to an increase in mandatory systemwide fees for a summer session.

(e) (1) In cases where the Governor’s proposed budget reduces General Fund appropriations from the prior annual Budget Act for the support of the operations of University of California or California State University, the Legislature enacts or authorizes reduced General Fund appropriations from the prior annual Budget Act for the support of the operations of University of
 California or California State University, the Legislature enacts a budget reduction for the General Fund support of the operation of the University of California or California State University in the middle of a fiscal year, or the Governor implements a budget reduction for the General Fund
 support of the operation of the University of California or California State University in the middle of a fiscal year, subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) shall not apply.

(2) In the instances described in paragraph (1), the University of California and the California State University shall discuss with their respective statewide student associations proposals for mandatory systemwide fee increases at least seven days before posting notice of action to increase those fees. An increase in the mandatory systemwide fees at the University of California or the California State University shall not become effective until at least 30 days have elapsed after the date on which the fee increase was adopted.

(f) Following the adoption of an
 increase in mandatory systemwide fees in accordance with this act, the University of California and the California State University shall notify matriculated students of the mandatory systemwide fees to be assessed in the upcoming academic year or the upcoming quarter or semester. In addition, the respective institution shall simultaneously inform students about the availability of student financial aid and the procedures for obtaining that financial aid in order to assist students with meeting the increased costs of attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   (AB 970)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

66028.4.

(a) On or before April 2, 2013, the regents and the trustees each shall develop a list of factors that shall be taken into consideration when developing recommendations to adjust mandatory systemwide fees consistent with the policies set forth in this article. The factors shall include, at a minimum, the level of state support, total cost of attendance, impact on various categories of students, including historically underrepresented students and low- to middle-income students, as well as efforts to mitigate the impacts.

(b) The factors, and any subsequent amendments to those factors, shall be developed in consultation with the appropriate statewide student body associations and shall be formally adopted by the regents or
 the trustees in an open and public meeting.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt any increase in mandatory systemwide fees from the requirements of Section 66028.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 642, Sec. 2.   (AB 1307)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

66028.5.

(a) The regents and the trustees are urged to maintain their commitment to institutional financial aid program funding by ensuring that at least 33 percent of the revenues of an increase to existing mandatory systemwide fees charged to undergraduate students is set aside by the regents or the trustees, as applicable, for institutional student aid to assist resident undergraduate students, including those undergraduate students exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Sections 68075.5 and 68130.5, and families in meeting the total cost of education.

(b) The regents and trustees shall report their compliance with this section in their respective annual reports on institutional financial aid pursuant to Section
 66021.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 642, Sec. 3.   (AB 1307)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

66028.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, commencing with the 2012–13 academic year, the regents and the trustees shall annually provide the Legislature, by February 1 of each year, with detailed information regarding expenditures of revenues derived from student fees and uses of institutional financial aid, and shall provide information regarding the systemwide average total cost of attendance per student. For purposes of meeting the requirements of this section, the regents and the trustees may include this information in their respective annual reports on institutional financial aid pursuant to Section 66021.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the
 Government Code,
 the regents and trustees shall each submit a report to the Legislature, by March 1 of each year, describing their respective institution’s compliance with the policies set forth in this article.

(c) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.   (AB 2908)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Educational Equity for Students [66030. - 66031.]

66030.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that public higher education in California strive to provide educationally equitable environments that give each Californian, regardless of age, economic circumstance, or the characteristics listed in Section 66270, a reasonable opportunity to develop fully his or her potential.

(b) It is the responsibility of the governing boards of institutions of higher education to ensure and maintain multicultural learning environments free from all forms of discrimination and harassment, in accordance with state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

66031.

(a) Subject to an appropriation of funds by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute for purposes of this section, the California State University may, and the University of California is requested to, establish and maintain inclusive college programs for students with intellectual and developmental disabilities at four-year public postsecondary educational institutions. Program funds may be used to establish new inclusive college programs at campuses that currently do not have a program or have a program in development, or to provide continuing support to established inclusive college programs to help those programs reach capacity and sustainability.

(b) Inclusive college programs operated by the California State University,
 and inclusive college programs operated by the University of California, are requested to do all of the following:

(1) Serve students with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are at least 18 years of age, even if the students are not taking courses for credit or may not be seeking a traditional degree.

(2) Provide students with a person-centered planning process and the opportunity to pursue an educational credential, including, but not limited to, a degree, certificate, or nondegree credential issued by the institution.

(3) Provide inclusive academic enrichment, socialization, independent living skills, and integrated work experiences that develop career skills that can lead to gainful employment.

(4) Provide individual supports and
 services for academic and social inclusion in academic courses, extracurricular activities, housing, and other aspects of campus life.

(5) Establish strategies to recruit and support students from historically underserved communities.

(c) Funds appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of this section may be used for any of the following purposes:

(1) Administrative salaries, including a program director at a campus with an inclusive pilot program and other administrative staff, including academic coordinators, employment and internship coordinators, social inclusion coordinators, and residential coordinators.

(2) Additional program staff, including instructors, peer mentors, residential support staff, and administrative assistants.

(3) Training for higher education faculty in evidence-based best practices.

(4) Augmentation of existing assistive technologies and other academic support services offered by campus disability programs and resource centers.

(5) Scholarships for student tuition, fees, and living expenses.

(6) Additional student supports, including counseling, residential needs, mentor services, and transportation services.

(7) Outreach, including internet website design, disseminating information to high school transition programs, local educational agencies, special education local plan areas, and college and career centers, and advertising placements and campaigns, including the cost of printing any
 materials.

(8) Data collection and dissemination.

(d) (1) An inclusive college program shall comply with the requirements for, and shall apply for, federal status as a Comprehensive Transition and Postsecondary Program so that its students can apply for federal financial aid.

(2) An inclusive college program shall investigate long-term sustainability by securing funding from multiple sources, including funds from the Department of Rehabilitation, regional centers, and financial aid programs.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Intellectual and developmental disabilities” has the same meaning as “developmental disability,” as defined
 in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) “Local educational agencies” means school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 654, Sec. 2.   (AB 447)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.1. Inclusive College for Students with Intellectual Disabilities [66032. - 66032.2.]

66032.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Center for Inclusive College increase awareness of, and access to, inclusive and experiential postsecondary education and employment opportunities for students with intellectual disabilities through degree, certificate, or nondegree programs that ideally include an independent living component.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish statewide support and coordination of the dissemination of information regarding programs and services for students with intellectual disabilities.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Center for Inclusive College increase access to meaningful postsecondary
 education credentials and work experiences to afford students with intellectual disabilities inclusive and meaningful campus experiences to prepare for gainful employment and community living.

(d) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the California Center for Inclusive College support the establishment and expansion of programs on college campuses that model inclusivity of all students, including those with intellectual disabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 90.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66032.1.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “California Center for Inclusive College” or “center” means the California Center for Inclusive College established pursuant to this article.

(b) “Inclusive college program” means a college program administered by a public postsecondary educational institution for students with intellectual disabilities in the state that offers students an inclusive program of study that includes opportunities to take courses, learn independent living skills, have employment experiences, and engage in social activities and organizations in a setting with other peers with and without disabilities, and that requires students with intellectual
 disabilities to have at least one-half of their participation in the program, as determined by the institution, focus on academic components through one or more of the following activities:

(1) Taking credit-bearing courses with students with and without disabilities.

(2) Auditing or otherwise participating in courses with students with and without disabilities for which the student does not receive regular academic credit.

(3) Taking noncredit-bearing, nondegree courses with students with and without disabilities.

(4) Participating in internships or work-based training in settings with individuals with and without disabilities.

(c) “Public postsecondary educational institution” means the
 California State University, the University of California, or the California Community Colleges, and each campus, branch, and function thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 90.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66032.2.

(a) The California Center for Inclusive College is hereby established and shall be administered by the county office of education or county offices of education selected pursuant to subdivision (b), working in partnership with regional centers, public postsecondary educational institutions, and the University of California, Davis MIND Institute.

(b) Commencing with the 2024–25 fiscal year, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be annually appropriated each fiscal year from the General Fund to the Superintendent to, in consultation with the executive director of the State Board of Education, allocate to one or more county offices of education selected to administer the center consistent with this section.

(c) (1) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall allocate the funding appropriated in Provision 3 of Item 6100-488 of Section 2.0 of the Budget Act of 2026 to the California Center for Inclusive College for purposes of implementing inclusive college programs, as defined in Section 66032.1. This funding shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2032.

(2) Of the funds available for the purpose described in paragraph (1), up to fifteen percent may be used for the administration of grant awards pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) The California Center for Inclusive
 College shall submit a report to the Department of Finance on or before December 1, 2026, detailing how it plans to award funds for institutions of higher education that are implementing new inclusive college programs, maintaining existing inclusive college programs, and expanding inclusive college programs. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the number of programs the center estimates the funding can support, the length of the grant period for the awards, characteristics of programs for grant prioritization if applicable, and how the center will provide oversight of the grant awardees. No funding shall be awarded to inclusive college programs under this subdivision until this report is approved by the Department of Finance.

(d) The responsibilities of the center shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Assisting California inclusive college programs in aligning with the federal requirements, standards, and quality indicators identified by the National Center for Information and Technical Support for Postsecondary Students with Disabilities and the coordinating center described in Section 1140q(b) of Title 20 of the United States Code, pursuant to Section 1140q of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(2) Assisting California inclusive college programs with the development and submission of federal comprehensive transition and postsecondary program applications.

(3) Facilitating collaboration between local educational agencies, regional centers, local Department of Rehabilitation field offices, and
 inclusive college programs to support students with intellectual disabilities and their parents, families, and supporters to plan for postsecondary transition, which shall include plans for high school diploma attainment.

(4) Assisting public postsecondary educational institutions and inclusive college programs with the identification of potential funding sources to establish, sustain, or expand upon inclusive college programs, including student financial assistance opportunities.

(5) Supporting inclusive college programs with guidance and assistance when applying for potential funding sources and student financial assistance opportunities.

(6) Holding meetings and annual workshops to share best practices and provide technical assistance on developing and establishing an inclusive college program, including opportunities to transition two-year programs to four-year programs and to incorporate a residential living component.

(7) Disseminating to local educational agencies, local Department of Rehabilitation field offices, and regional centers information about, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Education programs, services, and resources that are available at inclusive college programs.

(B) Supports, accommodations, technical assistance, and training provided by inclusive college programs.

(C) Mentoring, networking,
 and employment opportunities available at inclusive college programs.

(8) Meeting regularly with interested parties, including, but not limited to, people with intellectual disabilities and their parents, families, and supporters; staff of the State Department of Education, the State Board of Education, the State Department of Developmental Services, the Department of Rehabilitation, and the State Council on Developmental Disabilities; and public postsecondary educational institutions, with the goal of providing continuous improvement to the delivery of inclusive college programs to students with intellectual disabilities, by doing both of the following:

(A) Identifying federal grant funding opportunities for state agencies and assisting inclusive college programs in investigating options for long-term programmatic and fiscal sustainability.

(B) Sharing best practices, barriers, and challenges to establishing or expanding inclusive college programs.

(e) (1) For the 2024–25 fiscal year, of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (b), up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be available for the center to convene an advisory workgroup consisting of representatives from at least two, but not more than six, existing inclusive college programs throughout the state to consult with the center and to do all of the following:

(A) Collect and share
 best practices for inclusive college programs.

(B) Advise and assist the center in determining areas of greatest need for technical assistance for inclusive college programs.

(C) Support the center in exploring methods of capacity building to strengthen existing inclusive college programs.

(2) Each inclusive college program with representatives in the advisory workgroup shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with their participation in the advisory workgroup, in an amount not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each inclusive college program.

(f) To the extent practicable, the center shall leverage resources from the National Center for Information and Technical Support for Postsecondary Students with Disabilities and the coordinating center described in Section 1140q(b) of Title 20 of the United States Code, pursuant to Section 1140q of Title 20 of the United States Code, for best practices, frameworks, and effective implementation of programs for students with disabilities, including long-term planning to increase inclusive college programs.

(g) Beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year, and annually thereafter, on or before March 1 each fiscal year, the center shall provide to the Governor, the
 Legislature, and the Department of Finance a report regarding the implementation of this section; relevant data, including, but not limited to, student activities and demographic information, to the extent feasible and meaningful to measure access, equity, and outcomes; and recommendations to expand evolving best practices.

(h) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated, and included
 within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 129.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Doctoral Programs in Education [66040. - 66040.7.]

66040.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) Since its adoption in 1960, the Master Plan for Higher Education has served the state exceedingly well, allowing California to create the largest and most distinguished higher education system in the nation. A key component of the Master Plan is the differentiation of mission and function, whereby doctoral and identified professional programs are limited to the University of California, with the provision that the California State University can provide doctoral education in joint doctoral degree programs with the University of California and independent California colleges and universities. This differentiation of function has allowed California to provide universal access to postsecondary education while preserving quality.

(b) Because of the urgent need for well-prepared administrators to lead public school and community college reform efforts, the State of California is hereby making an exception to the differentiation of function in graduate education that assigns sole authority among the California public higher education segments to the University of California for awarding doctoral degrees independently. This exception to the Master Plan for Higher Education recognizes the urgency of meeting critical public school and community college leadership needs and the distinctive strengths and respective missions of the California State University and the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 269, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

66040.3.

(a) Pursuant to Section 66040, and notwithstanding Section 66010.4, in order to meet specific educational leadership needs in the California public schools and community colleges, the California State University is authorized to award the Doctor of Education (Ed.D.) degree as defined in this section. The authority to award degrees granted by this article is limited to the discipline of education. The Doctor of Education degree offered by the California State University shall be distinguished from doctoral degree programs at the University of California.

(b) The Doctor of Education degree offered by the California State University shall be focused on preparing administrative leaders for California public elementary and secondary schools and community colleges and on the knowledge and skills needed by administrators to be effective leaders in California public schools and community colleges. The Doctor of Education degree offered by the California State University shall be offered through partnerships through which the California public elementary and secondary schools and community colleges shall participate substantively in program design, candidate recruitment and admissions, teaching, and program assessment and evaluation. This degree shall enable professionals to earn the degree while working full time.

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or preclude the California Postsecondary Education Commission from exercising its authority under Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 66900) to review, evaluate, and make recommendations relating to, any and all programs established under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 269, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

66040.5.

With regard to funding the degree programs authorized in Section 66040.3, the California State University shall follow all of the following requirements:

(a) Funding on a per full-time equivalent student (FTES) basis for each new student in these degree programs shall be funded from within the California State University’s enrollment growth levels as agreed to in the annual Budget Act. Enrollments in these programs shall not alter the California State University’s ratio of graduate instruction to total enrollment, and shall not come at the expense of enrollment growth in university undergraduate programs. Funding provided from the state for each FTES shall be at the agreed-upon marginal cost calculation that the California State University receives.

(b) Each student in the programs authorized by this article shall be charged fees no higher than the rate charged for students in state-supported doctoral degree programs in education at the University of California, including joint Ed.D. programs of the California State University and the University of California.

(c) The California State University shall provide any startup funding needed for the programs authorized by this article from within existing budgets for academic programs support, without diminishing the quality of program support offered to California State University undergraduate programs. Funding of these programs shall not result in reduced undergraduate enrollments at the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 269, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

66040.7.

The California State University, the Department of Finance, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall jointly conduct a statewide evaluation of the new programs implemented under this article. The evaluation required by this section shall consider all of the following:

(a) The number of new doctoral programs in education implemented, including information identifying the number of new programs, applicants, admissions, enrollments, degree recipients, time-to-degree, attrition, and public school and community college program partners.

(b) The extent to which the programs established under this article are fulfilling identified state needs
 for training in educational leadership, including statewide supply and demand data that considers capacity at the University of California and in California’s independent colleges and universities.

(c) Information on the place of employment of students and the subsequent job placement of graduates.

(d) Any available evidence on the effects that the graduates of the programs are having on elementary and secondary school and community college reform efforts and on student achievement.

(e) Program costs and the fund sources that were used to finance these programs, including a calculation of cost per degree awarded.

(f) The costs of the programs to students, the amount of financial aid offered, and student debt levels of graduates of the programs.

(g) The extent to which the programs established under this article are in compliance with the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 36.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.6. Doctoral Programs in Audiology [66041. - 66041.1.]

66041.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:
